Washington statutes.
RCW 35.71.910

Chapter controls inconsistent laws.

Insofar as the provisions of this chapter are inconsistent with a provision of any other law, the provisions of this chapter shall be controlling.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.71.910. Prior: 1961 c 111 s 15.]